Hawaii statutes.
[§93-16] Publication and distribution of
reports. (a) Notwithstanding any other statute, law, charter provision,
ordinance, or rule to the contrary, whenever a government agency is required to
submit a report to the legislature, the report shall be:

(1) Available in printed form;

(2) Submitted in printed form to the president of the
senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the legislative
reference bureau library; and

(3) Posted on the designated central State of Hawaii website; or

(4) Posted on the Internet in an easily-located
manner.

(b) If a government agency submits a report to
the legislature that is a consolidation of reports mandated by law of that
agency or other agencies that are administratively attached to the government
agency submitting the consolidated report, then the agency submitting the
consolidated report shall include:

(1) A listing of each mandated report that is being
included in the consolidated report; and

(2) The specific time period covered by the particular
government agency's report if different from the time period covered by the
consolidated report.

(c) For purposes of this section,
"government agency" means the judiciary and each department, board,
commission, or officer of the State or any of its political subdivisions. [L
2001, c 231, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 1 but is
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next